Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.42.010

City treasurer—Miscellaneous authority and duties.

In addition to authority granted and duties imposed upon code city treasurers by this title, code city treasurers, or the officers designated by charter or ordinance to perform the duties of a treasurer, shall have the duties and the authority to perform the following: (1) As provided in RCW 8.12.500 relating to bonds and compensation payments in eminent domain proceedings; (2) as provided in RCW 68.52.050 relating to cemetery improvement funds; (3) as provided in RCW 41.28.080 relating to custody of employees' retirement funds; (4) as provided in RCW 47.08.100 relating to the use of city street funds; (5) as provided in RCW 46.68.080 relating to motor vehicle funds; (6) as provided in RCW 41.16.020 and chapter 41.20 RCW relating to police and firefighters' relief and pension boards; (7) as provided in chapter 42.20 RCW relating to misappropriation of funds; and (8) as provided in chapter 39.60 RCW relating to investment of municipal funds. The treasurer shall be subject to the penalties imposed for the violation of any of such provisions. Where a provision of this title, or the general law, names the city treasurer as an officer of a board or other body, or assigns duties to a city treasurer, such position shall be filled, or such duties performed, by the officer of a code city who is performing the duties usually performed by a city treasurer, although he or she may not have that designation.

[ 2009 c 549 s 3039; 1987 c 331 s 78; 1984 c 258 s 320; 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.42.010.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1987 c 331: See RCW 68.05.900.

Court Improvement Act of 1984—Effective dates—Severability—Short title—1984 c 258: See notes following RCW 3.30.010.

Intent—1984 c 258: See note following RCW 3.34.130.